Washington statutes.
RCW 39.56.030

Issuing officer to fix rate.

It shall be the duty of every public officer issuing public warrants to make monthly investigation to ascertain the market value of the current warrants issued by him or her, and he or she shall, so far as practicable, fix the rate of interest on the warrants issued by him or her during the ensuing month so that the par value shall be the market value thereof.

[ 2011 c 336 s 810; 1981 c 156 s 16; 1981 c 10 s 4; 1899 c 80 s 5; RRS s 7303.]